District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.08

Certificates of registration.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 9, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 5(d), (e), (f), 27 DCR 3280
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-1148.
1973 Ed., § 1-858.